Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Supreme Court


from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue


Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,


the sum of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or so much


thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed upon the


Supreme Court by law.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1921 CC 3/31/2025 10:37:07 AM

Req. No. 1921 Page 1